Massachusetts, session 194th, S1436.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Subsection (a) of section 2-3 of article 2 of the charter of the city of Everett, 
which is on file with the archivist of the commonwealth, as provided in section 12 of chapter 
43B of the General Laws, is hereby amended by striking out the words “authorized by chapter 
268A of General Laws or by the state ethics commission” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- said office or employment is within the public school district of the city or 
otherwise authorized by chapter 268A of the General Laws. No member of the city council shall 
hold any employment or appointed office within the public school district unless said office or 
employment was held 120 days prior to nomination papers being pulled for the city council 
position.  

of 3 10  SECTION 2. Said subsection (a) of said section 2-3 of said article 2 of said charter is 
hereby further amended by striking out the figure “30”, each time it appears, and inserting in 
place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- 90.    
SECTION 3. Subsection (a) of section 2-4 of said article 2 of said charter is hereby 
amended by inserting after the first paragraph the following paragraph:-  
If authorized by the city council to serve as a special municipal employee under chapter 
268A of the General Laws, a city council member shall not collect compensation for the special 
municipal employee position if the member holds other compensated city employment or another 
city office in addition to a city council position, including, but not limited to, employment or an 
office within the public school district.   
SECTION 4. Subsection (a) of section 4-3 of article 4 of said charter is hereby amended 
by striking out the words “authorized by chapter 268A of the General Laws or the state ethics 
commission” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- said office or employment is 
within the executive or legislative branch of state government and authorized by chapter 268A of 
the General Laws or the state ethics commission.   
A member of the school committee shall not hold any other appointed city office or city 
employment unless said office or employment was held 120 days prior to nomination papers 
being pulled for the school committee position.   
SECTION 5. Said subsection (a) of said section 4-3 of said article 4 of said charter is 
hereby further amended by striking out the figure “30”, each time it appears, and inserting in 
place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- 90.  

of 3 31  SECTION 6. Section 4-4 of said article 4 of said charter is hereby amended by inserting 
after the fourth sentence the following sentence:- If authorized by the city council to serve as a 
special municipal employee under chapter 268A of the General Laws, a school committee 
member shall not collect compensation for the special municipal employee position if the 
member holds another compensated city employment or city office.   
SECTION 7. This act shall take effect upon its passage.